Utah statutes.
62A-2-118.   Administrative inspections.

(1)  The office may, for the purpose of ascertaining compliance with this chapter, enter and inspect on a routine basis the facility of a licensee.

(2)  Before conducting an inspection under Subsection (1), the office shall, after identifying the person in charge:

(a)  give proper identification;

(b)  request to see the applicable license;

(c)  describe the nature and purpose of the inspection; and

(d)  if necessary, explain the authority of the office to conduct the inspection and the penalty for refusing to permit the inspection as provided in Section 62A-2-116.

(3)  In conducting an inspection under Subsection (1), the office may, after meeting the requirements of Subsection (2):

(a)  inspect the physical facilities;

(b)  inspect and copy records and documents;

(c)  interview officers, employees, clients, family members of clients, and others; and

(d)  observe the licensee in operation.

(4)  An inspection conducted under Subsection (1) shall be during regular business hours and may be announced or unannounced.

(5)  The licensee shall make copies of inspection reports available to the public upon request.

(6)  The provisions of this section apply to on-site inspections and do not restrict the office from contacting family members, neighbors, or other individuals, or from seeking information from other sources to determine compliance with this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 188, 2005 General Session

